Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Unitization of Oil and Gas Fields and Pools

§ 53-3-101.
Applications; hearings.

The State Oil and Gas Board upon the application of any interested person shall, after notice as herein provided, hold a hearing to consider the need for the operation as a unit of an entire field, or of an entire pool or pools, or of any portion or portions or combinations thereof, within a field, for the production of oil or gas or both, in order to increase the ultimate recovery thereof or to prevent waste. The board may reopen the hearing provided in this section at any time prior to the final order adjudicating that the requirements of section 53-3-107 have been satisfied.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-101; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1972).

§ 53-3-103.
Oil and Gas Board may order unit operation.

The State Oil and Gas Board may issue an order requiring such unit operation, if it finds that:

Unit operation of the field or of any pool or pools, or of any portion or portions or combinations thereof within the field, is reasonably necessary in order to effectively carry on secondary recovery, pressure maintenance, repressuring operations, cycling operations, water flooding operations, or any combination thereof, or any other form of joint effort calculated to substantially increase the ultimate recovery of oil or gas or both, from the unit so formed, or to prevent waste as defined in Section 53-1-3; and

One or more method of unitized operation as applied to such common source of supply or portion thereof is feasible and will prevent waste or will with reasonable probability result in the recovery of substantially more oil or gas, or both, from the unit so formed than would otherwise be recovered; and

The plan of unitization and the agreements effectuating same are fair and reasonable under all of the circumstances and protect the rights of all interested parties; and

The correlative rights of interested parties will be protected; and

The estimated additional cost incident to conducting such operation will not exceed the value of the estimated additional recovery of oil and gas and such cost of unit operation shall not be borne by the royalty owners.

The operators of such unit shall have drilled a sufficient number of wells to a sufficient depth and at such locations as may be necessary for the board to approve the boundaries of the unit and determine that the field, pool or pools have been reasonably developed according to a spacing pattern approved by the board. No field unitization shall be approved by the board until each drilling unit of the field has been drilled; however, the board is hereby authorized to waive the requirement that each and every drilling unit be drilled upon a finding of fact that it is not economically feasible for a specific drilling unit to be drilled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-102; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 365, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1972).

§ 53-3-105.
Provisions and requirements of board’s order.

The order issued by the State Oil and Gas Board shall be fair and reasonable under all of the circumstances and shall protect the rights of interested parties and shall include:

A description of the geographical area and a description of the pool or pools, or of any portion or portions or combinations thereof affected which together constitute and are herein termed the “unit area.”

A statement of the nature of the operations contemplated.

A formula for the allocation among the separately owned tracts in the unit area of all the oil or gas, or both, produced and saved from the unit area, and not required in the conduct of such operation, which formula must expressly be found reasonably to permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such separately owned tracts to receive, in lieu thereof, their fair, equitable and reasonable share of the unit production or other benefits thereof. A separately owned tract’s fair, equitable and reasonable share of the unit production shall be that proportionate part of unit production that the contributing value of such tract for oil and gas purposes in the unit area and its contributing value to the unit bears to the total of all like values of all tracts in the unit, taking into account all pertinent engineering, geological and operating factors that are reasonably susceptible of determination.

A provision for adjustment among the owners of the unit area (not including royalty owners) of their respective investment in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials, equipment and other things and services of value attributable to the unit operations. The amount to be charged unit operations for any such item shall be determined by the owners of the unit area (not including royalty owners), but if said owners of the unit area are unable to agree upon the amount of such charges, or to agree upon the correctness thereof, the board shall determine them after due notice and hearing thereon, upon the application of any interested party. The amount charged against the owner of a separately owned tract shall be considered expense of unit operation chargeable against such tract. The adjustments provided for herein may be treated separately and handled by agreements separate from the unitization agreement. The expense of dry holes drilled within the unit area prior to the effective date of an order of the board, as determined by Section 53-3-107, shall not be chargeable as investment under subsection (c) of Section 53-3-109, unless such dry hole is used in the unit operation, in which event its value to the unit shall be charged as investment.

A provision that the costs and expenses of unit operation, including investment past and prospective, shall be borne by the owner or owners (not entitled to share in production free of operating costs and who in the absence of unit operation would be responsible for the expenses of developing and operating) of each tract in the same proportion that such tracts share in unit production. Each owner’s interest in the unit area shall be responsible for his proportionate share thereof, and the unit operator shall have a lien thereon to secure payment of such share. When any owner fails to pay his part thereof when due and interest thereon at the legal rate, then all of such owner’s interest in the unit production and equipment may be foreclosed in the same manner and under the same procedures provided for the foreclosure of mortgages in chancery court.

A transfer or conversion of any owner’s interest or any portion thereof, however accomplished after the effective date of the order creating the unit, shall not relieve the transferred interest of said operator’s lien on said interest for the cost and expense of unit operations, past or prospective.

The designation of, or a provision for the selection of a successor to the unit operator. The conduct of all unit operations by the unit operator, and the selection of a successor to the unit operator, shall be governed by the terms and provisions of the unitization agreements.

The time the unit operation shall become effective and the manner in which, and the circumstances under which, the unit operation shall terminate.

A requirement that all oil and/or gas contained in a unit area shall be produced and sold as rapidly as possible without decreasing the ultimate recovery of such oil and/or gas or causing damage to the reservoir.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-103; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 3; Laws, 1972, ch. 365, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1972).

§ 53-3-107.
When order becomes effective.

An order requiring unit operations pursuant to Section 53-3-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not be effective unless and until the plan of unitization and the agreements incorporating the provisions of Section 53-3-105 have been signed or, in writing, ratified, adopted or approved by the owners or lessees of at least seventy-five percent (75%) interest on the basis of and in proportion to the surface acreage content of the unit area under the terms of the order and the agreement incorporating the provisions of Section 53-3-105 has been signed or, in writing, ratified, adopted or approved by at least seventy-five percent (75%) (exclusive of royalty interests owned by lessees or by subsidiaries or successors in title of any lessee) in interest of the royalty owners on the basis of and in proportion to the surface acreage content of the unit area and the board has made a finding to that effect, either in the order or in a supplemental order. In the event the required percentages have not signed, ratified or approved the respective agreements within twelve (12) months from and after the date of such order, it shall be automatically revoked.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-104; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 379, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1987).

§ 53-3-109.
Amendment of orders; extension of units and inclusion of additional pools.

The State Oil and Gas Board, after notice and hearing, by entry of new or amending orders, may from time to time enlarge the unit area by approving agreements adding to the unit operation a pool or pools or any portion or portions or combinations thereof not theretofore included, and extensions of existing pools. Any such agreement, in providing for allocation of production from the unit area, shall first allocate to each pool or portion thereof so added a portion of the total production of oil or gas, or both, from all pools affected within the unit area, as enlarged, such allocation to be based on the relative contribution which such added pool or portion or extensions thereof are expected to make, during the remaining course of unit operations, to the total production of oil or gas, or both, to the unit as enlarged. The production so allocated to each added pool or portion thereof shall be allocated to the separately owned tracts in the added unit area on the basis of the relative contribution of each such tract, as provided in paragraph (c) of Section 53-3-105. The remaining portion of unit production shall be allocated among the separately owned tracts within the previously established unit area in the manner provided by the unitization agreement. Orders promulgated under this paragraph shall become operative at 7:00 a.m. on the first day of the month next following the day on which the order becomes effective under the provisions of paragraph (b) of this section.

An order promulgated by the board under paragraph (a) of this section shall not become effective unless and until (1) all of the terms and provisions of the plan of unitization and the unitization agreement relating to the extension or enlargement of the unit area or to the addition of a pool or portions thereof or extensions of existing pools to unit operations have been fulfilled and satisfied and evidence thereof has been submitted to the board, and (2) the extension or addition effected by such order has been agreed to in writing by the owners or lessees of at least seventy-five percent (75%) in interest on the basis of and in proportion to the surface acreage content of the area or pools or portions thereof or extensions of existing pools to be added to the unit operation by such order and also by at least seventy-five percent (75%) (exclusive of royalty interests owned by lessees or by subsidiaries or successors in title of any lessee) in interest of the royalty owners on the basis of and in proportion to the surface acreage content in the area or pools or portions thereof or extensions of existing pools to be added to the unit operation by such order, and evidence thereof has been submitted to the board, and (3) the owners of the existing unit have agreed in the manner provided in Section 53-3-107 or in accordance with the terms of the unitization agreement, to the extension or addition. In the event all of the above requirements are not fulfilled within twelve months from and after the date of such order, it shall be automatically revoked.

After the operative date of an order promulgated under this section, costs and expenses of operation of the unit, as enlarged, shall be governed by paragraph (e) of Section 53-3-105. Adjustment among the owners of the unit area, as enlarged, (not including royalty owners) of their respective investments in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials, equipment and other things and services of value attributable to the operation of the unit area, as enlarged, shall be governed by paragraph (d) of Section 53-3-105.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-105; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 315, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 53-3-111.
How production allocated.

The portion of unit production allocated to a separately owned tract within the unit area shall be deemed, for all purposes, to have been actually produced from such tract, and operations with respect to any tract within the unit area shall be deemed for all purposes to be the conduct of operations for the production of oil or gas, or both, from each separately owned tract in the unit area. However, when an oil, gas and mineral lease contains land partially within and partially without said unit area, the unit agreement and production from the unit shall have no force and effect on lands lying outside of such unit area and failure of the lessee or lessees thereof to drill and develop such lands lying outside said unit area within one (1) year or during the term of the lease, whichever is a longer period of time, from the date of determination of the unit area by the state oil and gas board shall render such lease or leases on lands lying outside said unit area void and of no force and effect, unless otherwise held by production other than from unit production.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-106; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 365, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1972).

§ 53-3-113.
Authority of unit operator; production by others prohibited.

From and after the effective date of an order of the board entered under the provisions of Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119, the operation of any well producing from the unit area defined in the order by persons other than the unit operator or persons acting under the unit operator’s authority, or except in the manner and to the extent provided in such plan of unitization, shall be unlawful and is hereby prohibited.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-107; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 5, 1964).

§ 53-3-115.
Time and manner of giving notice.

The notice provided for in Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119 shall be given in the time and manner as required by law and the rules and regulations of the oil and gas board for hearings by said board and shall be completed at least thirty days before the date set for the hearing.

The secretary of the board shall, in addition thereto, mail a notice not less than thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing to all persons owning the interests in the land within the unit area which said secretary by due diligence can ascertain. The failure of said secretary, however, to mail said notice to any such owner shall not affect the validity of any hearing held pursuant to the notice published in accordance with the preceding paragraph, or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to such hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-108; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved June 5, 1964).

§ 53-3-117.
Administration of Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119.

In administering Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119, the oil and gas board shall be governed and controlled by the declaration of policy set out in Section 53-1-1 et seq., and except as otherwise herein expressly provided, all proceedings held under Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119, including the filing of petitions, the giving of notices, the conduct of hearings and the entry of orders and appeals therefrom, shall be governed and controlled by the procedure provided for by Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the oil and gas board pursuant to said sections. The definition of the terms used in Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119 shall be controlled by definitions contained in Section 53-1-3, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the oil and gas board pursuant to Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, unless a definition appearing in Section 53-1-3 is entirely inconsistent with the meaning and purpose of the term as used in Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119, in which event such term shall be given that meaning that is harmonious with and tends to effectuate the purposes of Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-109; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 5, 1964).

§ 53-3-119.
Court review of order of oil and gas board by appeal to the chancery court.

Any interested person adversely affected by any provision of Sections 53-3-101 through 53-3-119 or by any rule, regulation or order made by the state oil and gas board thereunder, or by any act done or threatened thereunder, may obtain court review and seek relief by appeal, which appeal shall be to the chancery court of the county wherein the land involved, or any part thereof, is situated. The term “interested person” as used herein shall be interpreted broadly and liberally and shall include all mineral and royalty owners. Any interested party may appeal to the chancery court of the county wherein the land involved or any part thereof is situated, if appeal be demanded within thirty (30) days from the date that such rule, regulation or order of the board is filed for record in the office of the board.

Such appeal may be taken by filing notice of the appeal with the state oil and gas board, whereupon the board shall, under its certificate, transmit to the court appealed to all documents and papers on file in the matter, together with a transcript of the record, which documents and papers together with said transcript of the record shall be transmitted to the clerk of the chancery court of the county to which the appeal is taken.

Except as hereinabove provided, such appeal shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Sections 53-1-39 and 53-1-41.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-110; Laws, 1964, ch. 236, § 10; Laws, 1972, ch. 365, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 380, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1984).